New York, session 2025-2026, S1133.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 404-ff to read as follows: 3 § 404-ff. Distinctive "guardians for schools" license plates. 1. Any 4 person residing in this state shall upon request be issued a distinctive 5 "guardians for schools" license plate bearing the phrase "guardians for 6 schools". Application for said license plates shall be filed with the 7 commissioner in such form and detail as the commissioner shall 8 prescribe. 9 2. Any distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be 10 issued in the same manner as other number plates upon the payment of the 11 regular registration fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this 12 article provided, however, that an additional annual service charge of 13 twenty-five dollars shall be charged for such plate. Such annual service 14 charge shall be deposited pursuant to the provisions of section four 15 hundred four-oo of this article to the credit of the guardians for 16 schools fund established by section ninety-seven-zzzz of the state 17 finance law, and shall be used for purpose of ensuring increased securi- 18 ty in public schools. Provided, however, that one year after the effec- 19 tive date of this section, funds in the amount of five thousand dollars, 20 or so much thereof as may be available shall be allocated from such fund 21 to the department to offset costs associated with the production of such 22 license plate. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03533-01-5 S. 1133 2 1 § 2. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 97-zzzz 2 to read as follows: 3 § 97-zzzz. Guardians for schools fund. 1. There is hereby estab- 4 lished in the joint custody of the commissioner of taxation and finance 5 and the comptroller, a special fund to be known as the "guardians for 6 schools fund". 7 2. Such fund shall consist of all revenues received pursuant to the 8 provisions of section four hundred four-ff of the vehicle and traffic 9 law and all other moneys appropriated, credited, or transferred thereto 10 from any other fund or source pursuant to law. Nothing contained in this 11 section shall prevent the state from receiving grants, gifts or bequests 12 for the purposes of the fund as defined in this section and depositing 13 them into the fund according to law. 14 3. Moneys of the fund shall be expended for the sole purpose of ensur- 15 ing increased security in public schools, including, but not limited to, 16 helping pay for school resource officers, security training, mental 17 health counseling, metal detectors, security cameras and other school 18 building modifications to improve school safety. The commissioner of 19 education of the state of New York shall establish guidelines and crite- 20 ria for qualifying expenditures under this subdivision and shall promul- 21 gate all rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of 22 this subdivision. 23 4. Moneys shall be paid out of the fund on the audit and warrant of 24 the state comptroller on vouchers certified or approved by the commis- 25 sioner of education of the state of New York. 26 5. Any income earned on moneys in the guardians for schools fund shall 27 be added to and used for the purposes of such fund. 28 6. Monies of the fund shall be used solely for the use of school secu- 29 rity measures and may not be diverted into the general fund. 30 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 31 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 32 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 33 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 34 completed on or before such effective date.